apertium-ga-gd/apertium-ga-gd.ga-full.dix
    <pardef n="ma/ir__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ireadar</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ireadh</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ireadh</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ireadh</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ireadh</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ireamar</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ireann</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ireann</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ireann</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ireann</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ire</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ire</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ire</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ire</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ire</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irfeá</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irfeadh</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irfeadh</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irfear</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irfí</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irfidh</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irfidh</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irfidh</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irfidh</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irfidh</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irfidís</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irfimid</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irfimis</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irfinn</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iridís</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iridís</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irigí</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irimid</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irimid</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irim</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irimis</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irimis</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irim</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irinn</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irteá</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irtear</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irtí</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rtha</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rtha</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rtha</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rtha</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/inn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eanna</l>
          <r>inn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eann</l>
          <r>inn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inn</l>
          <r>inn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inne</l>
          <r>inn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="athchuir"><i>athchu</i><par n="ma/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aischuir"><i>aischu</i><par n="ma/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iarchuir"><i>iarchu</i><par n="ma/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ionchuir"><i>ionchu</i><par n="ma/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scoir"><i>sco</i><par n="ma/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lánscoir"><i>lánsco</i><par n="ma/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mair"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="síolchuir"><i>síolchu</i><par n="ma/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rinn"><i>r</i><par n="r/inn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trírinn"><par n="initial-t"/><i>rír</i><par n="r/inn__n"/></e>
